Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.015

Expenditure of funds declared public purpose.

Regional planning under the provisions of this chapter is hereby declared to be a proper public purpose for the expenditure of the funds of counties, school districts, public utility districts, housing authorities, port districts, cities or towns or any other public organization interested in regional planning.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.015. Prior: 1961 c 232 s 6.]